Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1736.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1352 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1352. Wild resource conservation plate.(a) Standard wild resource conservation plate.--The department, in consultation with the Wild Resource Conservation Board, shall design a special wild resource conservation registration plate. Upon application of any person, accompanied by a fee of $35 which shall be in addition to the annual registration fee, the department shall issue the plate under this subsection, or the registration plate under subsection (b) for a passenger car, motor home, trailer or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds. The Wild Resource Conservation Fund shall receive $15 of each additional 123456789101112131415161718 fee for [this plate.] the plate issued under this subsection or subsection (b).(b) Special wild resource conservation plate.--In addition to the current design, the department shall provide a design not in the family of plates that depicts a saw-whet owl perched upon a pine tree branch over a yellow-white background with the words "Conserve Wild Resources" at the top of the plate, with the words "Pennsylvania" overlaying a keystone at the bottom of the plate.(c) Allowing previous design.--The department shall allow an individual to use a previously valid registration plate issued by the department that has been discontinued provided the design is not in the family of plates and the registration plate depicts a saw-whet owl perched upon a pine tree branch over a yellow-white background with the words "Conserve Wild Resources" at the top of the plate, with the words "Pennsylvania" overlaying a keystone at the bottom of the plate provided the registration plate meets the requirements of section 1332 (relating to display of registration plate) and the alphanumeric pattern on the registration plate is available.Section 2. This act shall take effect in four months.20250HB1736PN2138 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021